hunspell/kpv/komi.aff
FLAG long
SFX W3 ьыны янторъясыслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янторъясыслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янторъясыслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янторъясысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясад/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясам/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясанӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясаныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясаным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясаныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясас/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяслань/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьӧдзным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьӧдзныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьӧдзыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьӧдзым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьӧдзыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьӧдныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьӧдным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьӧдныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьӧдыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьӧдым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьӧдыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьсьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьсьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьсьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьсьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьсьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьсьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьсяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьсяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьсяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьсяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьсяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьтіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьтіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьтіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьтіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьтіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьтіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланяд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланям/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясланяс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяснад/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяснам/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяснаныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяснаным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяснаныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяснас/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясныдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясныдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясныдлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясныдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясныдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясныдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяснымкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяснымла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяснымлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяснымлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяснымлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяснымлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяснымӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясныскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяснысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясныслань/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясныслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясныслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясныслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяснысӧ/G2 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяснытӧ/G2 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧдз/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧдзным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧдзныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧдзыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧдзым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧдзыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧдныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧдным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧдныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧдыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧдым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧдыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧйкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧйла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧйлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧйланьсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧйлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧйлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧйлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧйся/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧйсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧйтӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясся/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссяньым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссяыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъяссяыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясті/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъястіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъястіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъястіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъястіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъястіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъястіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъястӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъястӧгныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъястӧгным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъястӧгныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъястӧгыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъястӧгыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясыдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясыдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясыдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясыдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясыдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясын/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясыскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясыслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясыслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясыслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янъясысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны яныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны яныдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны яныдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны яныдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны яныдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны яныдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янын/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны яныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны яныскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны яныслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны яныслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны яныслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны янысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны яс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны ясны/G1G2G3 .
SFX W3 ьыны ясныс/G1G2G3 .

SFX W4 Y 1 # [^д]зыны 45
SFX W4 ны 0/G3G4 .

SFX W5 Y 1 # дзыны 10
SFX W5 ны 0/G3G4 .
