hunspell/kpv/komi.dic
встречайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
транспортируйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
предусматривайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
регулируйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
выгружайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
цементируйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
приветствуйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
уделяйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
выдерживайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
заключайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
керыштсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
рӧскодуйтчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
нажӧвитчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
стрӧитчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
бертсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вунӧдлывсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
быззьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мутшсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
дульзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
развёртывайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
коссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вӧрзьӧдчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
выражайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пелькӧдчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чукӧртчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
выводитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
быдмывсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пилипызьӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лимитавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мӧвпыштлывсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
дугдыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ульзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сяммӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
буль-болькерсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
куляссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
колебайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
инкрустируйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
исполняйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сувтчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пусьыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вугыртчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
серассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сырсйыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
дзоридзассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кольмыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
рабзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лябзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тювзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ыззьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
странзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шунзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
горзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
дурзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сырзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шызьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чользьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
колльыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вооружайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лязйӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
водсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гуляйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
предлагайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
комиссаравсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
подрубайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пӧкӧряйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вуджӧдчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сувтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ньӧбсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лэбавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
куйӧдавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
уджавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
дзордзавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
жӧникавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чышкавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пӧдлавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кӧлавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кылавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
помавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пожнавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
нёрпавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
серавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шӧравсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кималасавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
очсавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пактавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
креставсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кисьтавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
курччавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вӧвсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
видзӧдлывсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ваявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пӧлявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пӧсявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сывъявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шывкъявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пӧръявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
катшъявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
видсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
дугӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
бурдӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пазӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
комиӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
эскӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
уськӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сьылӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ваймӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
стӧчмӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
воӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
горӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
водтӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
нуӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ӧшӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гольӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
бӧрдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гижсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кодзсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
висьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кыйсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
жувксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
локсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мурксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пыксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ляксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тымсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ойбырмунсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шапсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
борсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
зырсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шеваассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лыаассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
эрдассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лэдзассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
діассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мешӧкассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кучкассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
дзеблассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
солассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
потлассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вомассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чӧсмассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вомӧнассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шебрассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шамрассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гӧтрассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
агсассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пуктассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пасьтассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вӧчассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шыассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
соссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сарӧгӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
быгйӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
выйӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лякӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
беринӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вирӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
бусӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пытшӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
килльӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
няньӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
плавгыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пондыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шердйыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
бӧрйыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ротйыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тупкыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
йӧткыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
нетшкыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
бергӧдлыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сувтлыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
слӧймыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
прыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ректыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чинтыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вештыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
инмӧдчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кутчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лэччыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
килльыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сорсьыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
быгляссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тшӧтяссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пужъяссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
торъяссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
песовтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
любитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
зарадитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
удитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
стружитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
примитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пӧчинитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шмонитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
стынитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тӧкаритсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тутӧритсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
винтитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
йӧршитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
таргайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
создайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пажнайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
разработайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
радейтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
проповедуйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
практикуйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
фильтруйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
котсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
весьӧпӧртсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
котыртсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
сьылыштсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гартыштсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шусьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
потшсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
куньсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вевттьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
охраняйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кыскыштсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
перерабатывайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чукӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
быльыксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лыддьывсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
китӧмсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
авзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
арзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
ванзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
вурзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
гользыны/W4W0V5V7V8
горзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
дівзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
ивзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
карзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
киньзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
кирзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
кливзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
клювзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
кравзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
кривзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
кывзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
ливзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
лимзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
льӧмзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
лювзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
лявзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
марзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
мурзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
нивзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
нирзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
нӧйзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
нявзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
нярзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
овзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
ойзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
равзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
ревзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
ривзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
тёвзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
тивзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
тювзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
тюрзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
тявзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
увзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
чавзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
чарзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
чивзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
чилзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
чирзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
ымзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
ырзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
эрзыны/W4W0V5V7V8
сьӧддзыны/W5W0V5V7V9
аддзыны/W5W0V5V7V9
бӧрддзыны/W5W0V5V7V9
вадзыны/W5W0V5V7V9
еддзыны/W5W0V5V7V9
коддзыны/W5W0V5V7V9
луддзыны/W5W0V5V7V9
ӧддзыны/W5W0V5V7V9
яндзыны/W5W0V5V7V9
